tests/aor.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tki.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tki.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "[twol] {A} pass after soft vowel": 
    گوستر<v><tv><pass><ger_impf><nom>: گوستریلن

  "[twol] {A} pass after hard vowel": 
    اوی<v><iv><pass><ger_impf><nom>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: اویولان
   
  "[twol] {ت} aor after soft vowel":
    ئت<v><tv><aor>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: ئدر 
    گیت<v><iv><ger_aor><nom>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: گیدر

  "[twol] {ت} aor after hard vowel":
    توت<v><tv><aor>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: توتار
    یات<v><iv><aor>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: یاتار

  "[twol] {A} abil hard vowel":
    قولان<v><tv><abil><aor>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: قولانابيلر
    اوزان<v><iv><abil><aor>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: اوزانابیلر

  "[twol] {A} abil soft vowel":
    سو<v><tv><abil><aor>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: سوەبیلر
    گیر<v><tv><pot><aor>+i<cop><aor><p3><sg>: گیرەبیلر
